it: Varietà di Physalis: Alchechengi peruviano; Alchechengi; Tomatillo verde; Ciliegia di terra; Ciliegia in foglia; Bacca inca; Tomatillo ananas; Tomatillo viola; Uchuva; Altro
lt-LT: Dumplūnių veislė: Peruvinė dumplūnė; Peruvinė dumplūnė; Žaliasis tomatilas; Žemuoginė dumplūnė; Paprastoji dumplūnė; Inkų uoga; Ananasinis tomatilas; Purpurinis tomatilas; Uchuva; Kita
ru: Сорт физалиса: Капский крыжовник; Золотая ягода; Зеленый томатильо; Земляной физалис; Земляничный физалис; Ягода инков; Ананасовый томатильо; Фиолетовый томатильо; Учува; Другое
hr-HR: Sorta Physalis: Peruanska jagoda; Zlatna bobica; Zeleni tomatillo; Mjehurica; Husk cherry; Inka bobica; Ananas tomatillo; Ljubičasti tomatillo; Uchuva; Ostalo
sv: Physalissort: Kapkrusbär; Gyllenbär; Grön tomatillo; Jordkörsbär; Bärlyktört; Inkabär; Ananastomatillo; Lila tomatillo; Uchuva; Övrigt
nl: Physalis variëteit: Kaapse kruisbes; Goudbes; Groene tomatillo; Ananaskers; Lampionplantkers; Inca-bes; Ananas-tomatillo; Paarse tomatillo; Uchuva; Overige
cs: Odrůda mochyně: Mochyně peruánská; Goldenberry; Zelené tomatillo; Mochyně pýřitá; Třešeň v obalu (Husk cherry); Incká bobule; Ananasové tomatillo; Fialové tomatillo; Uchuva; Ostatní
da: Physalissort: Ananaskirsebær; Goldenberry; Grøn tomatillo; Jordkirsebær; Hylsterkirsebær; Inkabær; Ananastomatillo; Lilla tomatillo; Uchuva; Andet
ja: ホオズキの種類: ケープグーズベリー; ゴールデンベリー; グリーントマティロ; グラウンドチェリー; ハスクチェリー; インカベリー; パイナップルトマティロ; パープルトマティロ; ウチュバ; その他
el: Ποικιλία Physalis: Cape gooseberry; Goldenberry; Πράσινο tomatillo; Ground cherry; Husk cherry; Inca berry; Tomatillo ανανά; Μωβ tomatillo; Uchuva; Άλλο
fr: Variété de physalis: Groseille du Cap; Baie des Incas; Tomatille verte; Cerise de terre; Amour en cage; Baie de l'Inca; Tomatille ananas; Tomatille pourpre; Uchuva; Autre
de: Physalissorte: Kapstachelbeere; Andenbeere; Grüne Tomatillo; Erdkirsche; Blasenkirsche; Inka-Beere; Ananas-Tomatillo; Violette Tomatillo; Uchuva; Andere
pt-PT: Variedade de Physalis: Fisális; Goldenberry; Tomatillo verde; Ground cherry; Husk cherry; Inca berry; Tomatillo ananás; Tomatillo roxo; Uchuva; Outra
bg-BG: Сорт физалис: Капско цариградско грозде; Златна боровинка; Зелено томатило; Земна череша; Обвита череша; Инка бери; Ананасово томатило; Лилаво томатило; Учува; Други
pl: Odmiana miechunki: Miechunka peruwiańska; Miechunka (goldenberry); Miechunka pomidorowa zielona; Rodzynek brazylijski; Miechunka; Jagody inkaskie; Miechunka ananasowa; Miechunka pomidorowa fioletowa; Uchuva; Inna
pt-BR: Physalis variedade: Camapu; Goldenberry; Tomatillo verde; Alquequenje; Husk cherry; Inca berry; Tomatillo abacaxi; Tomatillo roxo; Uchuva; Outros
zh-CN: 酸浆品种: 菇娘果; 黄金莓; 绿粘果酸浆; 地樱桃; 壳樱桃; 印加浆果; 菠萝粘果酸浆; 紫粘果酸浆; 乌丘瓦; 其他
ko: 피살리스 품종: 케이프 구즈베리; 골든베리; 그린 토마틸로; 그라운드 체리; 허스크 체리; 잉카 베리; 파인애플 토마틸로; 퍼플 토마틸로; 우추바; 기타
sl-SI: Sorta volčjega jabolka: Perujska volčja jabolka; Andska jagoda; Zeleni tomatillo; Mehiško volčje jabolko; Volčje jabolko; Inkovska jagoda; Ananasov tomatillo; Vijoličasti tomatillo; Uchuva; Drugo
nb: Physalis-variant: Kappstikkelsbær; Gullbær; Grønn tomatillo; Jordkirsebær; Hylsterkirsebær; Inkabær; Ananastomatillo; Lilla tomatillo; Uchuva; Annet
tr: Physalis çeşidi: Altın çilek; Altın çilek; Yeşil tomatillo; Güvey feneri; Güvey feneri; İnka çileği; Ananas tomatillo; Mor tomatillo; Uchuva; Diğer
ro-RO: Varietate de physalis: Cape gooseberry (Physalis); Goldenberry; Tomatillo verde; Cireașă de pământ; Cireașă în înveliș (husk cherry); Fruct incaș; Tomatillo ananas; Tomatillo mov; Uchuva; Altele
th: พันธุ์ฟิซาลิส: เคปกูสเบอร์รี; โกลเด้นเบอร์รี; โทมาทิลโลสีเขียว; กราวนด์เชอร์รี; ฮัสก์เชอร์รี; อินคาเบอร์รี; โทมาทิลโลสับปะรด; โทมาทิลโลสีม่วง; อูชูวา; อื่นๆ
es: Variedad Physalis: Uchuva; Aguaymanto; Tomatillo verde; Alquequenje; Tomatillo; Baya inca; Tomatillo piña; Tomatillo morado; Uchuva; Otra
hu: Földicseresznye-fajta: Perui földicseresznye; Aranybogyó; Zöld tomatillo; Földicseresznye; Zsidócseresznye; Inkabogyó; Ananász tomatillo; Lila tomatillo; Uchuva; Egyéb
vi: Giống Physalis: Cape gooseberry; Goldenberry; Tomatillo xanh; Ground cherry; Husk cherry; Inca berry; Tomatillo dứa; Tomatillo tím; Uchuva; Khác
en: Physalis variety: Cape gooseberry; Goldenberry; Green tomatillo; Ground cherry; Husk cherry; Inca berry; Pineapple tomatillo; Purple tomatillo; Uchuva; Other
fi: Lyhtykoison lajike: Kapinkarviainen; Goldenberry; Vihreä tomatillo; Lyhtykoiso; Husk cherry; Inkamarja; Ananastomatillo; Violetti tomatillo; Uchuva; Muu
zh-TW: 酸漿品種: 秘魯苦蘵; 黃金莓; 綠色黏果酸漿; 苦蘵; 毛酸漿; 印加莓; 鳳梨酸漿; 紫色黏果酸漿; 烏丘瓦; 其他
sk-SK: Odroda machovky: Machovka peruánska; Zlatá bobuľa; Zelené tomatillo; Machovka (Ground cherry); Machovka (Husk cherry); Inkská bobuľa; Ananásové tomatillo; Fialové tomatillo; Uchuva; Iné